Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0371, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Contingent contract with dental administrator. (a) The commissioner shall determine the extent to which managed care and county-based purchasing plans in the aggregate meet the performance benchmark specified in subdivision 1 for coverage year 2024. If managed care and county-based purchasing plans in the aggregate fail to meet the performance benchmark, the commissioner, after issuing a request for information followed by a request for proposals, shall contract with a dental administrator to administer dental services beginning January 1, 2026, for all recipients of medical assistance and MinnesotaCare, including persons served under fee-for-service and persons receiving services through managed care and county-based purchasing plans. (b) The dental administrator must provide administrative services, including but not limited to: (1) provider recruitment, contracting, and assistance; (2) recipient outreach and assistance; (3) utilization management and reviews of medical necessity for dental services; (4) dental claims processing; (5) coordination of dental care with other services; (6) management of fraud and abuse; (7) monitoring access to dental services; (8) performance measurement; (9) quality improvement and evaluation; and (10) management of third-party liability requirements. (c) Dental administrator payments to contracted dental providers must be at deleted text begin thedeleted text end rates deleted text begin established under sections 256B.76 and 256L.11deleted text end new text begin at least equal to the average rates paid by managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans for coverage year 2024new text end . (d) Recipients must be given a choice of dental provider, including any provider who agrees to provider participation requirements and payment rates established by the commissioner and dental administrator. The dental administrator must comply with the network adequacy and geographic access requirements that apply to managed care and county-based purchasing plans for dental services under section 62K.14. (e) The contract with the dental administrator must include a provision that states that if the dental administrator fails to meet, by calendar year 2029, a performance benchmark under which at least 55 percent of children and adults who were continuously enrolled for at least 11 months in either medical assistance or MinnesotaCare received at least one dental visit during the calendar year, the contract must be terminated and the commissioner must enter into a contract with a new dental administrator as soon as practicable. (f) The commissioner shall implement this subdivision in consultation with representatives of providers who provide dental services to patients enrolled in medical assistance or MinnesotaCare, including but not limited to providers serving primarily low-income and socioeconomically complex populations, and with representatives of managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 3c, is amended to read: Subd. 3c. Health Services Advisory Council. (a) The commissioner, after receiving recommendations from professional physician associations, professional associations representing licensed nonphysician health care professionals, and consumer groups, shall establish a 14-member Health Services Advisory Council, which consists of 13 voting members and one nonvoting member. The Health Services Advisory Council shall advise the commissioner regarding (1) health services pertaining to the administration of health care benefits covered under Minnesota health care programs (MHCP); and (2) evidence-based decision-making and health care benefit and coverage policies for MHCP. The Health Services Advisory Council shall consider available evidence regarding quality, safety, and cost-effectiveness when advising the commissioner. The Health Services Advisory Council shall meet at least quarterly. The Health Services Advisory Council shall annually select a chair from among its members who shall work directly with the commissioner's medical director to establish the agenda for each meeting. The Health Services Advisory Council may recommend criteria for verifying centers of excellence for specific aspects of medical care where a specific set of combined services, a volume of patients necessary to maintain a high level of competency, or a specific level of technical capacity is associated with improved health outcomes. (b) The commissioner shall establish a dental subcouncil to operate under the Health Services Advisory Council. The dental subcouncil consists of general dentists, dental specialists, safety net providers, dental hygienists, deleted text begin health plan company anddeleted text end county and public health representatives, health researchers, consumers, and a designee of the commissioner of health. The dental subcouncil shall advise the commissioner regarding: (1) the critical access dental program under section 256B.76, subdivision 4, including but not limited to criteria for designating and terminating critical access dental providers; (2) any changes to the critical access dental provider program necessary to comply with program expenditure limits; (3) dental coverage policy based on evidence, quality, continuity of care, and best practices; (4) the development of dental delivery models; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) dental services to be added or eliminated from subdivision 9deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) the availability of dental services under MHCP and policies to improve MHCP recipients' access to the services. new text end (c) The Health Services Advisory Council may monitor and track the practice patterns of health care providers who serve MHCP recipients under fee-for-service, managed care, and county-based purchasing. The monitoring and tracking shall focus on services or specialties for which there is a high variation in utilization or quality across providers, or which are associated with high medical costs. The commissioner, based upon the findings of the Health Services Advisory Council, may notify providers whose practice patterns indicate below average quality or higher than average utilization or costs. Managed care and county-based purchasing plans shall provide the commissioner with utilization and cost data necessary to implement this paragraph, and the commissioner shall make these data available to the Health Services Advisory Council. Sec. 3. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; PAYMENTS FOR DENTAL SERVICES.new text end new text begin Upon implementation of a dental administrator administering dental services for all recipients of medical assistance and MinnesotaCare, the commissioner of human services must ensure the portion of the capitation rate paid to managed care organizations and county-based purchasing plans under medical assistance and MinnesotaCare attributable to the provision of dental services is directed toward the rates the dental administrator must pay dental providers under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0371, subdivision 3, paragraph (c). new text end